Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 3, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from  the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Business Development  De-
partment, for the following purposes:
(1) [Operations ..........................................$ 7,094,443]
Operations................................. $ 7,242,756
(2) Business, innovation
[and trade ............................................$ 56,363,565]
and trade................................... $ 57,016,079
(3) Oregon Infrastructure
[Finance Authority ............................ $ 1,548,664]
Finance Authority ..................... $ 2,561,780
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office ....... $ 1,207,545
SECTION 2.
 Section 4, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for the State School  Fund,
the amount of [ $464,758,594] $535,719,907.
SECTION 3.  Section 6, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund, to the office of the Governor, the amount  of [ $3,689,100]
$3,723,949 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 4.  Section 7, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a  process for al-
locating available moneys in the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund on a quar-
terly basis  to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to [ 12 of this 2017 Act ] 12a, chapter
598, Oregon Laws 2017 . The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in  any quarter, the moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are  insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to [ 12 of this 2017 Act or any other 2017 Act ] 12a, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017 , prior
to making any other  allocations pursuant to sections 1 to [ 12 of this 2017 Act ] 12a, chapter 598,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5703 (SB 5703-A) Page 1
Oregon Laws 2017, the department shall satisfy lottery bond debt service obligations in the  amount
of [ $247,787,311] $246,357,867 for outstanding lottery bonds.
(3) After the lottery bond debt service  obligations described in subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, if the remaining  moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are  insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to [ 12 of this 2017  Act ] 12a, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017 , the department shall reduce
the quarterly allocations not described in subsection (2) of this section proportionately in amounts
sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 5.
 Section 8, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development  Fund, to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the
amount of [ $247,787,311] $246,357,867 for the purpose of paying, when due, the principal, interest and
premium, if any, on outstanding lottery bonds, as described  in section 7 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter
598, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section 4 of this 2018 Act .
SECTION 6.  Section 10, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  Notwithstanding and in lieu of the  requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for a percentage-
based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the amount allocated from  the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Problem Gambling Treatment Fund is
[$12,457,116] $12,498,909.
SECTION 7.  Section 13, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  There are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Veterans’ Ser-
vices Fund, to the Veterans’ Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lottery Fund, the following
amounts for the following purposes:
(1) [Veterans’ Services Program ........... $ 7,833,718]
Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 8,176,492
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ................................................$ 6,904,151
(3) National Service
Organizations ..................................... $ 118,156
SECTION 8.  Section 17, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 17.  There are allocated to the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the  Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
[and standards operations ................ $ 32,584,757]
and standards operations .......... $ 36,316,251
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ........ $ 200,030
SECTION 9.
 Section 20, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 20.  There are allocated to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established un-
der ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, from the Criminal Fine Account, the fol-
lowing amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
[and emergency preparedness .......... $ 3,588,745]
and emergency preparedness .... $ 3,615,658
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ............. $ 2,824,208
SECTION 10.
 Section 23, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  (1)  There is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $80,987,200.
(2) There is allocated  to the [ Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account established
under ORS 430.380 ] Oregon Health Authority , for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, from the
Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $40,493,600 , for:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5703 (SB 5703-A) Page 2
(a) Deposit in the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account established un-
der ORS 430.380; or
(b) Purposes related to mental health treatment  and alcohol and drug abuse prevention,
early intervention and treatment .
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  health systems division, for the
biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $10,123,400 for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $30,370,200.
SECTION 11. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5703 (SB 5703-A) Page 3